Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 5. Rights-of-way Acquired under Former 43 U.S.C. 932.

Sec. 19.30.400.
Identification and acceptance of rights-of-way.

The state claims, occupies, and possesses each right-of-way granted under former 43 U.S.C. 932 that was accepted either by the state or the territory of Alaska or by public users. A right-of-way acquired under former 43 U.S.C. 932 is available for use by the public under regulations adopted by the Department of Natural Resources unless the right-of-way has been transferred by the Department of Natural Resources to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, in which case the right-of-way is available for use by the public under regulations adopted by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

The Department of Natural Resources shall conduct the necessary research to identify rights-of-way that have been accepted by public users under former 43 U.S.C. 932 and that have not been previously identified, and shall annually report to the legislature by the first day of each regular session of the legislature on rights-of-way that have been identified and that are not listed in this section.

The rights-of-way listed in (d) of this section have been accepted by public users and have been identified to provide effective notice to the public of these rights-of-way. The failure to include or identify a right-of-way under (d) of this section does not relinquish any right, title, or interest the public has in a right-of-way.

The following rights-of-way are identified by the name of the right-of-way and the identification number the right-of-way has been assigned by the Department of Natural Resources in the Historic Trails Database, known as the “RST” number, which contains a complete description of the right-of-way:

RIGHT-OF-WAY NAME RST NUMBER Cobb Lakes Trail 0001 Taylor — Humboldt 0002 Hajducovich — Macomb Plateau Trail 0003 Jualin Mine Road 0004 Marvel Creek Cat Trail 0005 Taylor Creek — Serpentine Hot Springs 0006 Eureka — Rampart 0007 Harrison Creek — Portage Creek 0008 Coldfoot — Chandalar Lake Trail 0009 Chicken — Franklin 0010 Eagle — Alder Creek Trail 0011 Nabesna — Chisana 0012 Poorman — Ophir Route 1 0013 Unuk River Road 0014 Long — Birch Creek Road 0015 Aurora Trail (Dahl-Deering) 0016 Knik Glacier Trail 0017 Bettles — Wild Lake River Trail 0018 Poorman — Ophir Route 2 0019 Wrong Way Lane (Harding Lake Trail) 0020 Akiak — Crooked Creek 0021 Akiakchak/Akiak — Phillips Bro-Russian Mis 0022 Aniak — Tuluksak 0024 Beaver — Caro 0027 Bennett’s Cutoff 0028 Bethel — Quinhagak 0030 Bethel — Kasigluk 0031 Bethel — Tuluksak 0032 Bluff — White Mountain 0034 Boulder Creek Trail 0036 Tramway Bar 0038 Candle — Kiwalik 0042 Rex Creek Trail 0043 Chena Hot Sprgs — East Fork (Van Curlers) 0046 Chickaloon — King River Road 0047 Chistochina — Slate Creek 0048 Chulitna Trail 0052 Telaquana Trail 0057 Dahl Creek Tractor Trail #1 0058 Crooked Creek — Aniak 0059 Davidson’s Landing — Taylor 0060 Stephan Lake — Murder Lake 0061 Dime Landing — Haycock Trail 0062 Dishkaket — Kaltag 0063 Donnelly — Washburn 0064 Dunbar — Brooks Terminal 0066 Eagle — Circle Mail Trail 0067 Egegik — Kanatak 0068 Elliot — Kotsina 0069 Ester — Dunbar 0070 Flat — Georgetown 0076 Flat — Holy Cross — Anvik 0077 Fortymile — Franklin 0078 Murder Lake North to Ridgeline 0080 Meiers Lodge — Dickey Lake 0082 Batzulnetas — Suslota Pass Trail 0083 Golovin — Council 0084 Christian — Arctic Village 0085 Goodnews Bay — Togiak 0086 South Spit Goodnews Bay — Platinum Creek 0087 Nakeen — Igiugig Winter Trail 0090 Holy Cross — Kaltshak (Kalskag) 0092 Hooper Bay — Scammon Bay 0093 Houston — Willow Creek 0095 Iditarod — Dishkaket 0097 Iditarod — Shageluk — Anvik (southern route) 0098 Indian River — Portage Creek Trail 0100 Iron Creek — American Creek 0101 Alatna — Shungnak 0105 Katalla — Yakataga 0106 Girdwood — Eagle River via Crow Pass 0110 Indian Pass Trail 0111 Kiana — Klery Creek 0114 Kiana — Selawik — Shungnak 0115 Kinak — Kipnuk 0116 Kiwalik — Noorvik 0117 Knik — Susitna 0118 Kobi — Bonnifield Trail to Tatlanika Creek 0119 Kotlik — Marshall 0120 Kotsina Trail 0121 Kotzebue — Noatak 0122 Nimiuk Point — Shungnak 0124 Lakeview — McDougal 0126 Larsen Bay — Karluk River 0127 Lewis Point — Naknek 0128 Lewis Landing — Dishkaket 0129 Lillywig Creek Winter Sled Road 0130 Lynx Creek Spur 0132 McCarthy — Green Butte 0135 McDougal — Peters Creek (Cache Creek) 0136 McGrath — Candle Creek 0137 McGrath — Takotna (Winter) 0138 Millard Trail 0139 McGrath — Telida 0140 Johnson Pass 0142 Gilmore Trail Branch — Smallwood Creek 0144 Mills Creek — Cache Creek 0145 Naknek — Egegik 0148 Nancy Lake — Susitna 0149 Nenana — Tanana (serum run) 0152 Nixon Fork — Nixon Mine 0153 Nizina — Bremner Sled Road 0155 Nizina — Chitina River 0156 Nome — Teller Coastal Trail 0158 Lillywig Creek Summer Pack Trail 0159 Nuka Bay 0160 Nulato — Dishkaket 0161 Batzulnetas — Nabesna River 0162 Ophir — Dishkaket 0164 Ophir — Iditarod 0165 Otter Creek Towpath 0167 Paimute — Marshall 0168 Penny River Trail 0170 Quinhagak — Goodnews Bay 0173 Rainy Pass — Big River 0174 Kiagna River Trail 0179 Skagway — Glacier 0186 Slana — Tanana Crossing 0188 Snowshoe — Beaver 0189 St. Michael — Kotlik 0190 Strelna — Kuskulana 0194 Dillingham — Lewis Point 0195 Susitna — McDougal 0198 Susitna — Rainy Pass 0199 Susitna — Tyonek 0200 Takotna — Flat (Winter, via Moore Creek) 0201 Takotna — Flat (Summer) 0202 Takotna — Nixon Fork (Winter) 0203 Takotna — Nixon Fork 0204 Takotna — Twin Peaks 0206 Taku River 0207 Bettles — Coldfoot 0209 Barnum — Slate Creek 0211 Teller — American River 0212 Teller — Cape Prince of Wales 0213 Teller — Pilgrim Hot Springs 0214 Togiak — Nushagak 0215 Topkok — Candle 0216 Unalakleet — St. Michael 0218 Upper Landing — Bear Creek 0220 Egegik — Cold Bay 0221 Vault Creek — Treasure Creek 0224 Woodchopper — Coal Creek 0226 Yentna — Mills Creek 0228 Yukon — Kuskokwim Portage 0229 Bielenberg Trail 0230 North Fork Chena River 0231 Swede Lake — Little Swede Lake — Denali Hwy 0232 Tok River Road 0233 Circle — Fairbanks Trail 0237 Candle — Independence Trail 0239 Kaiyuh Hills (Galena) 0245 Paxson — Slate Creek 0248 O’Connor Creek Trail 0251 Ahtell Creek Trail 0253 Wiseman — Chandalar 0254 Anvik — Kaltag 0255 Beaver Lake via Bryan Creek 0256 Beaver — Horse Creek — Chandalar Lake 0257 Dome Creek — Steel Creek 0258 Canyon Creek — Walkers Fork 0260 Caro — Big Creek 0261 Caro — Coldfoot 0262 Caro — Chandalar Mine 0263 Old Mail Trail (Nenana — Minto) 0264 Chisana — Horsfeld 0265 Sleetmute — Taylor Mountains 0266 McCord Bay Trail 0267 Ouzinki Trail 0268 Circle — Ft. Yukon 0270 Khayyam Mine Trail 0272 Monashka Mountain Trail 0274 Ewan Lake Seismic Trail 0275 Chisana — Big Eldorado Creek 0277 Young Bay Trail 0279 Chatanika — 12 Mile Summit (Winter) 0280 Island Bay — Salmon Creek Trail 0282 Franklin Steele Creek 0284 Fourth of July Creek Trail 0286 Ft. Gibbon — Kaltag Trail 0287 Lawrence Creek — Claybluff Point 0288 Tanana — Allakaket 0289 Goat Trail 0290 Telaquana Trail — Nondalton 0291 Gulkana — Denali (Winter) 0294 Gulkana — Valdez Creek (Summer) 0295 Dewey Lake Trail 0298 Kaltag — Topkok — Solomon — Nome Trail 0299 Windy Bay — Port Chatham Portage 0300 Liberty Cabin — Dome Creek 0302 Manley Hot Springs — Sullivan Creek 0303 Wilson Creek Trail 0304 McClaren River Trail 0305 Mentasta — Tetlin Trail 0307 Hughes — Mile 70 0308 Montana Creek Trail (Juneau quad) 0309 Portage Creek Trail 0311 Paimut Portage 0317 Paxson — Denali (Valdez Creek) 0318 Platinum Creek Trail 0319 Nabesna — Northway 0321 Salcha — Caribou Sled Road 0322 Scammon Bay — Hamilton — St. Michael (Winter) 0323 Nizina — Chisana (Skolai Pass) 0325 Goodnews — Arolik River 0326 Tanunak — Umkumiut 0327 Talkeetna — Iron Creek 0331 Togiak — Ungalikthluk 0332 Tanana Crossing — Grundler Trail 0333 Tuluksak — Kalskag 0335 Tanunak — Tooksook Bay 0336 Copper Mountain 0337 White River Trail 0338 Dahl Creek Tractor Trail #2 0339 Lignite — Stampede 0340 Roosevelt — Kantishna 0341 Roosevelt — Glacier 0342 Kobi-Kantishna 0343 Lignite — Kantishna 0344 Kobi — McGrath (via Nikolai and Big River) 0345 Nenana — Kantishna 0346 Spruce Creek Trail 0348 Nizina — Chisana (Glacier Trail) 0361 Tana River Trail 0363 Cape Yakataga — White River 0366 Portage Bay — Mt. Demian Oil Camp 0367 Haycock — Candle 0368 Nikolai Mine Trail 0372 Nabesna River — Canadian Border 0374 Paint River Trail 0375 Stephen, Murder and Daneka Lake Connector 0377 North Fork of Fortymile — Big Delta 0379 Moore Creek — Sleetmute 0380 Ruby Creek — Doherty Creek Trail 0381 Mt. Lazier Trail 0383 Kotzebue — Kiwalik (Winter Coast Trail) 0387 Merrill River — Stony River Trail 0388 Flat — Aniak 0389 Dahl Creek Tractor Trail #3 0390 Tanacross — Ketchumstuk 0391 Trail #52 — Black Mt 0392 Dahl Creek Tractor Trail #4 0393 Chignik Lagoon — Aniakchak River 0394 Iliamna — Pile Bay 0396 Fosters Camp — Grass Valley 0397 Orange Hill Trail 0400 Tasnuna Route 0404 King’s County Trail 0405 Johnson River — Kinak Trail 0406 Groundhog Basin 0408 Jack Wade — Steel Creek (Winter) 0409 Jack Wade — Steel Creek (Summer) 0410 Chandalar — Chandalar Mine Trail 0411 Slate Creek 0412 Eldorado Sled Road 0414 Dago Creek Road 0415 Caribou Lane (Back Road) 0419 Slate Creek — Johnson Creek 0420 Ketchumstuk — Chicken 0421 Ptarmigan Creek Trail 0423 Hanagita Trail 0425 Hicks Creek Trail (a/k/a Pinochle Creek) 0426 Chickaloon River Trail 0427 Styx River Trail 0428 Bear Creek — Saw Pit Creek 0430 Marvel Creek — Beaver Creek Trail 0431 Caribou Creek Trail 0433 Tolsona Lake Trail 0434 Windy Creek Tractor Trail #1 0436 Chistochina — Mankomen Lake Trail 0437 Nabesna — Chisana (Route 2) 0439 Mentasta — Slate Creek 0440 Healy Creek Trail 0444 Ft. Yukon — Birch Creek 0446 Wolverine Lake Trail 0447 Goodpastor River Trail 0449 Hickel Highway 0450 Golden Fleece Mine Trail 0451 Ungalik — Candle 0455 Unalakleet — Beeson Slough 0456 Beeson Slough — Second Creek (Winter) 0457 Norton Bay — Eschscholtz Bay 0458 Cosjacket — Kuskokwim Mountains 0460 Bonnifield Trail 0462 Nation River — Rampart House 0466 Central — Circle Pack Trail 0467 Hunter Creek — Livengood 0468 McWilliams — Gold Creek Trail 0469 Serpentine Hot Springs — Shishmaref 0470 Teller — Shishmaref (Winter) 0471 Teller — Shishmaref (Winter — Easterly route) 0472 Anikovik River — Potato Mountain 0473 Hetta Inlet — Jumbo Basin 0475 Circle — Chalkytsik — Yukon Border 0476 Ft. Yukon — Christian 0477 Ft. Yukon — Beaver 0478 Little Gerstle River — Sheep Creek 0480 Ear Mountain Spur 0481 Copper Creek Trail (McCarthy quad) 0483 Katmai — Savonoski 0490 Rex — Roosevelt 0491 Glacier — Kantishna via Caribou Creek 0492 Quigley Ridge Road 0493 Discovery — Prince Creek (Slate Creek) 0495 Iniskin Peninsula Road 0496 Prince Creek 0497 Michigan Creek Trail 0500 Stuyahok — Tuckers Slough 0504 Nilumat Creek — Towak Mountain 0505 Shageluk — Holikachuk Winter Trail 0506 Stuyahok — Cabin 0507 Holy Cross — Travis Cabins 0508 Mouth of Windy Creek — Landing Strip 0510 Long Creek — Mine on Bird Creek 0511 Willow Creek Trail (Talkeetna quad) 0512 Dutch Crk — Bear Crk — Peters Crk (Winter) 0513 Camp Crk Lndg — Collinsville — Black Crk 0514 Treasure Crk Lndg — Camp Crk Lndg Strip 0515 Black Creek Winter Trail 0516 Windy Creek Access Road 0517 May-Be-So Creek Trail 0519 Karta River Trail 0520 Sulzer Portage Trail 0521 Hadley — Kasaan Bay Trail 0526 Iniskin Bay — Oil Bay Trail 0529 Montana Loop Trail 0536 Otter — Swinging Dome Cabins — Reindeer Riv 0538 Otter Creek — Iditarod River 0539 Otter Creek Tramway — Moose Creek 0540 Willow Creek — Mine 0541 Little Creek Trail 0542 Murray Creek Trail 0543 Butte Creek — Chicken Creek Trail 0544 Return Creek — Crooked Creek 0545 Return Creek Landing — Crooked Creek Ruins 0546 Donlin Creek — Dome Creek — Crooked Creek via Omega 0547 Dome Creek — Anaconda — Bell Creek 0548 Anaconda — Snow Gulch 0549 Crooked Creek Cabin — American Creek 0550 Big Yetna River — Winter Ridge — Little Yetna 0551 Lake — Big Yetna River 0552 Big Creek — Takotna Roadway 0553 Return Creek — Haystack Butte — Flat — Crooked Creek 0554 First Chance Creek — Bonanza Creek Loop 0555 First Chance Creek across Glacier — Horsefly 0556 Dikeman — First Chance Creek Tr. 0557 Rampart House — Demarcation Point 0560 Willow Creek — Prince Creek 0562 Chickaloon — Knik — Nelchina 0564 Copper Center — Nelchina 0565 Green Monster Mine Trail 0566 Windham Bay Trail 0567 Chuck River Trail 0568 Sumdum Mines Trail 0569 Portage Pass Trail (Portage — Whittier) 0572 Resurrection Pass Trail 0579 Palmer Creek Lakes Trail 0580 Squaw Creek Trail 0589 Coldfoot — Junction Trail 49 (east route) 0591 Chilkoot Trail 0592 Perseverance Trail 0597 Sheep Creek Trail 0599 Lemon Creek Trail 0601 Nugget Creek Trail (Juneau quad) 0602 Spaulding Meadows Ski Circuit Trail 0603 Peterson Lake Trail 0604 Eagle River Trail 0606 Yankee Basin Trail 0607 One Mile Trail 0609 Highway — Gakona River Short-cut 0611 Bessie Mine Trail 0612 Hadjukovich — Horn Mountain Trail 0613 Colorado — Fox Creek 0614 Summit Creek Trail 0615 Pass Creek Trail (Seward quad) 0616 Windy Creek Tractor Trail #2 0617 Central — Deadwood Creek Trail 0618 Stetson Creek Trail 0619 Tanana — Rampart along Yukon River 0620 Bear Creek Trail (Hope) 0621 Fink Creek — Candle Trail 0623 Falls Creek Mine Trail 0626 Copper Center — Valdez 0633 Explorers Kenai River Trail 0634 Beeson Slough — Shaktoolik Roadhse — Ungalik 0635 Noorvik — Selawik 0639 Chena Lowlands Winter Trail Connections 0641 Gilmore Trail — Fairbanks Creek Connector Trail 0650 Moores Lake Trail 0680 Jarvis Creek Trail 0687 Lake George Trail 0688 Windy Creek Trails (Cantwell) 0707 Healy — Diamond Coal Mine Dirt Road 0709 Cripple Landing — Innoko River 0729 Cripple Landing — Rennie’s Landing 0730 Cripple Landing — North Fork Innoko River 0731 Gambell — Boxer Bay 0738 Cape Woolley — Teller 0740 Osborn/Buster Creek — Iron Creek Trail 0741 Tonsina Trail (Tonsina L — Richardson Hwy) 0746 Norton Bay — McKinley Creek 0747 Shaktoolik River — Junction Creek 0752 Koyuk — Bald Head Trail 0755 Lake Minchumina — Kuskokwim River 0758 Ketchumstuk Winter Trail 0789 Boundary — Lassen Landing Strip 0792 Trout Creek Trail 0803 Boulder Creek Trail 0810 Graveyard Creek — Cabins 0823 Alfred Creek Trail 0824 Thanksgiving Creek Trail 0836 Grant Creek — Moran Dome Trail 0837 Palisades Portage 0840 Elliot Creek Trail 0844 Ninemile Point — Choris Peninsula 0869 Killeak Lake Trail 0870 Shungnak River Trail 0873 Ross Creek and Jackson Lake — Twin Lakes 0879 Alexanders Village — Veh — Tenjerlow Lakes 0881 Middle Fork — Chandalar Trail 0890 Hammond River Trail 0899 Ninemile Hills — Midas Creek 0904 Gordon — U.S. Border Tractor Trail 0912 Nuvagapak Pt Landing Strip — Kogatpak River 0913 Poker (Pokok) Lagoon Southeast 0914 Tarnayariak River — Camden Bay 0916 Anderson Point East 1042 Bullen — Staines River 1043 Jack Wade Landing — Boundary 1065 Snettisham — Mines 1137 Treadwell Ditch 1169 Kanatak — Becharof Lake Road 1176 Dalton Trail 1225 Malaspina Glacier Trails 1232 Horsveldt — Canadian Border 1304 Nizina River — Dan Creek Road 1343 Sawmill Gulch Trail 1344 Long Lake — Chitina River 1345 Glacier Creek — Mines 1346 Harris Dome Trail 1348 Kennicott Mine Trails 1349 Kuskulana River — McDougall Creek cabins 1350 Nikolai Mine — Nizina River 1354 Kimball Pass Trail 1355 Hurtle Creek Trail (Squaw Creek Trail) 1365 Red Mountain Trail 1369 Klutina Boat Landing 1372 Willow Lake Trail 1373 Copper River Bluff Trail 1374 Hudson Lake Trail 1380 Slide Mountain Trail 1383 O’Brien Creek Trail 1392 Copper River — Kotsina Connections 1393 Tiekel River — Klutina River Trail 1395 Bence Mountain Loop Trail 1396 Tonsina River — Klutina River Trail 1397 Mt. Simpson Loop Trail 1398 Tonsina Trail (Richardson Hwy — Copper River) 1413 Chitina — Elliot Trail 1416 Eklutna Lake Spur 1419 Eska Strip Mine Trail 1420 Belanger Pass Trail 1426 Tahneta Pass Trail 1427 Startup Lakes Trail 1428 Lake Leila Trail 1429 Eureka — Nelchina — Barnette Trail 1431 Jackass Canyon Trail 1433 Gypsum Creek Mine Trail 1435 Index Lake Trail 1438 Muddy Creek Trail 1439 Matanuska River Trail 1441 Old Man Creek Trail 1456 Herning Trail 1467 Willow Creek — Flat Creek Trail 1475 Homestake Creek — Serpentine Hot Springs 1482 Sourdough Creek Trail 1491 Akulurak — Kotlik 1495 Radio Tower Trail 1510 Lake Louise Road to Ewan Lake 1511 Lake Louise Trail 1522 Crater Lake Access Trail 1533 Jerky (Gergle) Lake Trail 1534 Arizona Lake Trail 1537 Mae West Lake Trail 1539 Lost Cabin Lake Trail (Atlasta House) 1540 Indian Creek Trail 1554 Canyon Creek Trail 1555 Copper River Trail 1567 Pass Creek Trail (Nabesna quad) 1571 Lick Creek Spur 1584 Scotty Creek Lodge — High Cache 1586 Northway Airport — Jatahmund Lake 1588 Paradise Hill — Cabin 1589 Gardiner Creek Trail 1590 Deadman Lake Campground Trail 1591 Tanada Lodge — Copper Lake Drainage 1592 Fortymile Station — Eagle 1594 Dunbar — Minto — Tolovana 1595 Eldorado Creek Trail 1596 Chena Lakes Trail 1598 Crooked Creek Trail 1601 Macklin Creek — Washington Creek Trail 1603 Leech Cutoff 1607 Youngstown — Home Lake 1608 Richardson Hwy — Gerstle River 1609 Macklin Creek Spur 1617 Talkeetna River Trail 1620 Wales — Shishmaref Coastal Winter Trail 1623 Tamarack Spur 1639 Cripple — Cripple Mountain (Winter) 1640 Newhalen River Portage 1641 Boulder Trail 1643 U.S. Creek — Nome Creek Tr. off Steese Hwy 1647 Gordon — U.S. Border (coastal) 1648 Tamayariak River — Simpson Cove 1649 Goodnews — Barnum 1658 Redwood Creek Trail 1659 Tokun Lake Trail 1660 Shepherd Creek — Lake Charlotte Trail 1661 Carbon Creek — Kusktaka Lake Tr. 1662 Bering River — Fourth Lake Trail 1663 Katalla — Clear Creek Trail 1666 Mt. Drum Trail 1668 Strelna Creek — Rock Creek 1669 Pass Creek Trail (McCarthy — Valdez quads) 1670 Kluvesna Creek — Clear Creek Loop 1671 Young Creek Loop Trail 1672 Sourdough Hill — Nizina River 1673 Delta River Trail 1674 Buck Creek Trail 1675 Manker Creek Trail 1676 Quartz Creek Trail (Tonsina L — Tiekel R) 1677 Slatka Creek Trail 1684 Clear Creek Trail 1685 Porcupine Creek Trail (Kuskulana) 1686 Nugget Creek Trail (McCarthy quad) 1687 Berg Creek Trail (McCarthy quad) 1689 Herning Trail — Question Creek 1691 Sikonsina Pass 1693 Iron Creek — North Fork Kaskwitna River 1694 Roaring Creek Trail 1695 Dixie Pass Trail 1696 Copper Creek Trail (Valdez quad) 1697 East Fork Creek Trail 1698 Middle Fork Trail 1699 Nevada Creek Trail 1700 Nugget Creek — Porcupine Creek 1704 Walls Creek — Clear Creek 1705 Wet Gulch Trail 1710 Gustavus Rink Trail 1711 St. Anne Lake Trail 1712 Mitchell — McPherson Mine Trail 1713 Lake Minchumina — Kuskokwim Portage Trail 1714 Bartholf Creek 1715 Richardson Highway — Fish Lakes Trail 1717 Kobuk — Dahl Creek Trail 1718 Dahl Creek — Wesley Creek Trail 1720 Kashwitna River Trail 1721 Fielding Lake Trail, North Shore 1722 Fielding Lake Trail, South Shore 1723 Candle — Deering Trail 1737 Kotzebue — Nimiuk Point Trail 1738 California Creek Trail 1741 Kobuk River — California Creek Mine 1742 Kobuk — Dahl Creek Landing Field 1745 Old Man Lake Trail 1746 Tonsina Trail — Old Edgerton Hwy 1747 Tok Dog Mushers Trail 1759 Ophir Creek — Bear Creek Trail 1783 Burles Creek Trail 1784 Canoe Landing — Kushtaka Lake Tr. 1785 Bering R. — Kushtaka Glacier Tr. 1786 Trout Creek — Clear Creek Trail 1787 Stillwater Creek Spur Trail 1788 Canyon Creek — First Berg Lake 1789 Boulder Creek — Mill Creek Trail 1790 Bellum’s Crossing — Kotsina R. Tr. 1791 Redwood Bay — Strawberry Point 1792 Bellum’s Crossing — Taral 1794 Circle Hot Springs — Medicine Lake 1800 Willow Creek — Elliot Creek Trail 1804 Chitina River — Strelna Trail 1805 Sevenmile Lake Trail (Denali Highway) 1814 Hudson Camp Trail 1843 Hutlinana Hot Springs Trail 1845 Tetlin — Alaska Highway Trail 1852 Ladue River Trail 1854 Steele Creek — Border 1871 Manley Hot Springs — Sullivan Creek 1872 Dry Bay Trail 1873 Cottonwood Bay — Old Iliamna 1876 Bear Creek — Eagle Creek 1884 Little Minook Creek — Troublesome Creek 1885 Hodanza River Trail 1889 Mission Creek Trail 1891 The Government Route — Fortymile Station to Eagle Supply Route 1892 Canyon Creek — Hanagita River 1894 Bremner River Trail 1895 Chickaloon — Coal Creek 1896 Purgatory — Stevens Village 1897 Lost Creek Trail (Yukon Flats) 1898 Minook Creek — Pioneer Creek 1899.

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For the time limit and conditions relating to recording the rights-of-way identified in subsection (d) of this section by the Department of Natural Resources, see § 3, ch. 26, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

Sec. 19.30.410.
Vacation of rights-of-way.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, or another agency of the state may not vacate a right-of-way acquired by the state under former 43 U.S.C. 932 unless

a reasonably comparable, established alternate right-of-way or means of access exists that is sufficient to satisfy all present and reasonably foreseeable uses;

the right-of-way is within a municipality, the municipal assembly or council has requested the vacation, a reasonable alternative means of access is available, and the vacation is in the best interests of the state; or

the vacation is approved by the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

Sec. 19.30.420.
Immunity from liability for damages; risk of use of right-of-way acquired under former 43 U.S.C. 932.

Notwithstanding AS

09.50.250

and AS

09.65.070

, the state and its political subdivisions are not liable for damages, injury, or death arising from AS

19.30.400

—

19.30.420

and the recording of any rights-of-way identified in AS

19.30.400

or acquired under former 43 U.S.C. 932.

A right-of-way identified under AS

19.30.400

or acquired under former 43 U.S.C. 932 that is not designated as part of the state highway system under AS

19.10.020

is traveled and used at the risk of the user. As to those rights-of-way and notwithstanding AS

09.50.250

and AS

09.65.070

, the state and a political subdivision of the state are not liable for damages, injury, or death

arising from the use of the right-of-way;

arising from the failure to inspect, mark, or maintain the right-of-way;

occurring in the right-of-way; or

associated with the right-of-way.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1998)